Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.275

Market development and promotion matching fund program.

There is created a market development and promotion matching fund program within the Washington state department of agriculture. The purpose of the program is to allow the department of agriculture and the agricultural industry to combine funds in order to enhance access to markets that are growth sales areas for the industry's product. The goal of the program is to expose buyers to Washington's diverse agricultural products. The agriculture [agricultural] industry may bring in buying missions, perform trade promotions in various markets, hire overseas contractors, and perform other marketing functions that help it target the correct buyer and market for its product.

[ 2001 c 324 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2001 c 324: "The legislature finds that the growing and processing of food and agricultural products is the dominant industry in Washington state and a major employer in rural Washington. The legislature also finds that agriculture is a critical component of Washington's international trade industry, accounting for billions of dollars in exports every year.

The legislature further finds that the export market for Washington's agricultural products has dropped significantly in recent years and that such a drop has negatively impacted the economy in Washington's agricultural regions. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to enhance Washington's international trade of agricultural products by increasing funding for the Washington state department of agriculture's international marketing program in an effort to promote marketing of Washington's products and to assist the agricultural industry in efforts to reduce trade barriers that stand in the way of trade in new and emerging markets." [ 2001 c 324 s 1.]